Utah statutes.
17-22-30.   Prohibition on providing copy of booking photograph -- Statement required -- Criminal liability for false statement.

(1)  As used in this section, "booking photograph" means a photograph or image of an individual that is generated:

(a)  for identification purposes; and

(b)  when the individual is booked into a county jail.

(2)  A sheriff may not provide a copy of a booking photograph in any format to a person requesting a copy of the booking photograph if:

(a)  the booking photograph will be placed in a publication or posted to a website; and

(b)  removal of the booking photograph from the publication or website requires the payment of a fee or other consideration.

(3) (a)  A person who requests a copy of a booking photograph from a sheriff shall, at the time of making the request, submit a statement signed by the person affirming that the booking photograph will not be placed in a publication or posted to a website that requires the payment of a fee or other consideration in order to remove or delete the booking photograph from the publication or website.

(b)  A person who submits a false statement under Subsection (3)(a) is subject to criminal liability as provided in Section 76-8-504.



Enacted by Chapter 404, 2013 General Session

